Utah statutes.
72-10-206.   Payment by appropriation or sale of bonds.

The purchase price or award for real property acquired, in accordance with the provisions of this part, for an airport or landing field may be paid for by appropriation of money available for the property or wholly or partly from the proceeds of the sale of bonds of the county, municipality, or other political subdivision, as the legislative body of the political subdivision shall determine, subject to the adoption of a proposition at a regular or special election, if the adoption of a proposition is a prerequisite to the issuance of bonds of the political subdivision for public purposes generally.

